Utah statutes.
16-16-604.   Security interest and set-off.
(1)  A member or transferee may create an enforceable security interest in its
financial rights in a limited cooperative association.
(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member may not create an
enforceable security interest in the member's governance rights in a limited
cooperative association.
(3)  The organic rules may provide that a limited cooperative association has
a security interest in the financial rights of a member to secure payment of
any indebtedness or other obligation of the member to the association.  A
security interest provided for in the organic rules is enforceable under, and
governed by, Title 70A, Chapter 9a, Uniform Commercial Code - Secured
Transactions.
(4)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member may not compel the
limited cooperative association to offset financial rights against any
indebtedness or obligation owed to the association.
